Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.010

Terms defined.

Whenever the words "city council" or "town council" are used in this and the following chapters relating to municipal local improvements, they shall be construed to mean the council or other legislative body of such city or town. Whenever the word "mayor" is used therein, it shall be construed to mean the presiding officer of said city or town. Whenever the words "installment" or "installments" are used therein, they shall be construed to include installment or installments of interest. Whenever the words "local improvement," "local improvements," or "municipal local improvements" are used therein, they shall be construed to include improvements owned or operated by a public corporation or by a public corporation and a city, town, or another public corporation. Whenever the words "public corporation" are used therein, they shall mean a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755.

[ 1987 c 242 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.43.010. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 117 s 2; 1911 c 98 s 68; RRS s 9421.]

NOTES:

Policy—1987 c 242: See note following RCW 35.43.005.